inc/guesstest.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +Sg +Pl ^GUESSNOUNSTEM +GUESS

LEXICON Root

Nouns ;

LEXICON Nouns

cat                                 NInfl ;
dog                                 NInfl ;
mouse                               NInfl ;
horse                               NInfl ;
^GUESSNOUNSTEM+GUESS:^GUESSNOUNSTEM NInfl ;

LEXICON NInfl

+N:0 Infl;

LEXICON Infl

+Pl:s  #;
+Sg:   #;
